Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XII. CABLE TELEVISION AND

TELECOMMUNICATION
SERVICE OFFENSES]

§708-8200 Cable television service fraud in
the first degree. (1) A person commits cable television service fraud in
the first degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Distributes written instructions or plans to
make or assemble a cable television service device and knows that the written
plans or instructions are intended to be used to make or assemble a device to
obtain cable television service without payment of applicable charges; or

(b) Distributes a cable television service device
and knows that the device is intended to be used to obtain cable television
service without payment of applicable charges.

(2) Cable television service fraud in the
first degree is a class C felony. [L 1987, c 268, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 300,
§1; am L 1989, c 261, §19]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next